dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- অমূল্য; অমূল্য -->
    <pardef n="অমূল্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সমন্বিত; সমন্বিত -->
    <pardef n="সমন্বিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিষ্ঠুরতম; নিষ্ঠুর -->
    <pardef n="নিষ্ঠুর/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- যৌক্তিক; যৌক্তিক -->
    <pardef n="যৌক্তিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিখ্যাত; বিখ্যাত -->
    <pardef n="বিখ্যাত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিষ্ঠুরতর; নিষ্ঠুর -->
    <pardef n="নিষ্ঠুর/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রিয়; প্রিয় -->
    <pardef n="প্রিয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশেষ; বিশেষ -->
    <pardef n="বিশেষ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- এশীয়; এশীয় -->
    <pardef n="এশীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জটিল; জটিল -->
    <pardef n="জটিল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অস্থায়ী; অস্থায়ী -->
    <pardef n="অস্থায়ী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঐতিহাসিক; ঐতিহাসিক -->
    <pardef n="ঐতিহাসিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পরীক্ষিত; পরীক্ষিত -->
    <pardef n="পরীক্ষিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সজ্জিত; সজ্জিত -->
    <pardef n="সজ্জিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অমীমাংসিত; অমীমাংসিত -->
    <pardef n="অমীমাংসিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উদার; উদার -->
    <pardef n="উদার__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সৎ; সৎ -->
    <pardef n="সৎ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দায়ী; দায়ী -->
    <pardef n="দায়ী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তৃতীয়; তৃতীয় -->
    <pardef n="তৃতীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আতঙ্কিত; আতঙ্কিত -->
    <pardef n="আতঙ্কিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- জড়িত; জড়িত -->
    <pardef n="জড়িত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অপ্রয়োজনীয়; অপ্রয়োজনীয় -->
    <pardef n="অপ্রয়োজনীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সহযোগী; সহযোগী -->
    <pardef n="সহযোগী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উগ্র; উগ্র -->
    <pardef n="উগ্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ভাড়াটে; ভাড়াটে -->
    <pardef n="ভাড়াটে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মার্কিন; মার্কিন -->
    <pardef n="মার্কিন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনলাইন; অনলাইন -->
    <pardef n="অনলাইন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বদ্ধপরিকর; বদ্ধপরিকর -->
    <pardef n="বদ্ধপরিকর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুন্দরতম; সুন্দর -->
    <pardef n="সুন্দর/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তীব্র; তীব্র -->
    <pardef n="তীব্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শীর্ষতম; শীর্ষ -->
    <pardef n="শীর্ষ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বোধগম্য; বোধগম্য -->
    <pardef n="বোধগম্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রাক্তন; প্রাক্তন -->
    <pardef n="প্রাক্তন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সরকারি; সরকারি -->
    <pardef n="সরকারি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- খোলা; খোলা -->
    <pardef n="খোলা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চতুর্থ; চতুর্থ -->
    <pardef n="চতুর্থ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিরক্ত; বিরক্ত -->
    <pardef n="বিরক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গ্রহণযোগ্য; গ্রহণযোগ্য -->
    <pardef n="গ্রহণযোগ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রতিষ্ঠিত; প্রতিষ্ঠিত -->
    <pardef n="প্রতিষ্ঠিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুন্দরতর; সুন্দর -->
    <pardef n="সুন্দর/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্থানীয়; স্থানীয় -->
    <pardef n="স্থানীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সহজতম; সহজ -->
    <pardef n="সহজ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সম্প্রসারিত; সম্প্রসারিত -->
    <pardef n="সম্প্রসারিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আশাবাদী; আশাবাদী -->
    <pardef n="আশাবাদী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="অমূল্য"><i>অমূল্য</i><par n="অমূল্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমন্বিত"><i>সমন্বিত</i><par n="সমন্বিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিষ্ঠুরতম"><i>নিষ্ঠুর</i><par n="নিষ্ঠুর/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যৌক্তিক"><i>যৌক্তিক</i><par n="যৌক্তিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিখ্যাত"><i>বিখ্যাত</i><par n="বিখ্যাত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিষ্ঠুরতর"><i>নিষ্ঠুর</i><par n="নিষ্ঠুর/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রিয়"><i>প্রিয়</i><par n="প্রিয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশেষ"><i>বিশেষ</i><par n="বিশেষ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="এশীয়"><i>এশীয়</i><par n="এশীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জটিল"><i>জটিল</i><par n="জটিল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অস্থায়ী"><i>অস্থায়ী</i><par n="অস্থায়ী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঐতিহাসিক"><i>ঐতিহাসিক</i><par n="ঐতিহাসিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পরীক্ষিত"><i>পরীক্ষিত</i><par n="পরীক্ষিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সজ্জিত"><i>সজ্জিত</i><par n="সজ্জিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অমীমাংসিত"><i>অমীমাংসিত</i><par n="অমীমাংসিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উদার"><i>উদার</i><par n="উদার__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সৎ"><i>সৎ</i><par n="সৎ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দায়ী"><i>দায়ী</i><par n="দায়ী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তৃতীয়"><i>তৃতীয়</i><par n="তৃতীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আতঙ্কিত"><i>আতঙ্কিত</i><par n="আতঙ্কিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="জড়িত"><i>জড়িত</i><par n="জড়িত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অপ্রয়োজনীয়"><i>অপ্রয়োজনীয়</i><par n="অপ্রয়োজনীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহযোগী"><i>সহযোগী</i><par n="সহযোগী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উগ্র"><i>উগ্র</i><par n="উগ্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাড়াটে"><i>ভাড়াটে</i><par n="ভাড়াটে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মার্কিন"><i>মার্কিন</i><par n="মার্কিন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনলাইন"><i>অনলাইন</i><par n="অনলাইন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বদ্ধপরিকর"><i>বদ্ধপরিকর</i><par n="বদ্ধপরিকর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুন্দরতম"><i>সুন্দর</i><par n="সুন্দর/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তীব্র"><i>তীব্র</i><par n="তীব্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শীর্ষতম"><i>শীর্ষ</i><par n="শীর্ষ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বোধগম্য"><i>বোধগম্য</i><par n="বোধগম্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রাক্তন"><i>প্রাক্তন</i><par n="প্রাক্তন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সরকারি"><i>সরকারি</i><par n="সরকারি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="খোলা"><i>খোলা</i><par n="খোলা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চতুর্থ"><i>চতুর্থ</i><par n="চতুর্থ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরক্ত"><i>বিরক্ত</i><par n="বিরক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গ্রহণযোগ্য"><i>গ্রহণযোগ্য</i><par n="গ্রহণযোগ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিষ্ঠিত"><i>প্রতিষ্ঠিত</i><par n="প্রতিষ্ঠিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুন্দরতর"><i>সুন্দর</i><par n="সুন্দর/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্থানীয়"><i>স্থানীয়</i><par n="স্থানীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সহজতম"><i>সহজ</i><par n="সহজ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্প্রসারিত"><i>সম্প্রসারিত</i><par n="সম্প্রসারিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আশাবাদী"><i>আশাবাদী</i><par n="আশাবাদী__adj"/></e>
